Maryland, session 2025, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1074*

HOUSE BILL 1074
Subtitle 2. Credit Card AND GIFT CARD Crimes.
8–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Cardholder” means the person named on the face of a credit card to whom or
for whose benefit the credit card is issued by an issuer.
(c) (1) “Credit card” means an instrument or device issued by an issuer for the
use of a cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services, or anything of value on credit.
(2) “Credit card” includes:
(i) a debit card, access card, or other device for use by a cardholder
to effect a transfer of funds through an electronic terminal, telephone, or computer;
(ii) a magnetic tape that orders or authorizes a financial institution
to debit or credit an account; and
(iii) a code, account number, or other means of account access that is
not encoded or truncated and can be used to:
1. obtain money, goods, services, or anything of value; or
2. initiate a transfer of funds.
(3) “Credit card” does not include:
(I) A GIFT CARD; OR
(II) a check, draft, or similar paper instrument.
(D) (1) “GIFT CARD” MEANS:
(I) A PAPER, METAL, PLASTIC, OR DIGITAL INSTRUMENT OR
DEVICE, INCLUDING A CARD WITH A MAGNETIC STRIPE, THAT IS ISSUED BY AN
ISSUER AND IS ABLE TO BE USED TO PURCHASE, EITHER WHOLLY OR IN PART,
MONEY, GOODS, SERVICES, OR ANYTHING OF VALUE THROUGH PRESENTATION OF
THE CARD ON WHICH A PREPAID BALANCE OF FUNDS IS STORED; OR
(II) A TANGIBLE OR INTANGIBLE INSTRUMENT OR DEVICE
BEARING A CODE, AN ACCOUNT NUMBER, OR OTHER MEANS OF ACCOUNT ACCESS
THAT IS NOT ENCODED OR TRUNCATED AND IS ABLE TO BE USED TO PURCHASE,
EITHER WHOLLY OR IN PART, MONEY, GOODS, SERVICES, OR ANYTHING OF VALUE

HOUSE BILL 1074 3
THROUGH PRESENTATION OF THE CODE, ACCOUNT NUMBER, OR ACCOUNT ACCESS
THROUGH WHICH A PREPAID BALANCE OF FUNDS IS STORED OR ACCESSIBLE.
(2) “GIFT CARD” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CREDIT CARD;
(II) AN ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER; OR
(III) MONEY, A CHECK, A DRAFT, OR ANY SIMILAR PAPER
INSTRUMENT.
(E) “INTENDED GIFT CARD RECIPIENT” MEANS THE PERSON TO WHOM THE
ORIGINAL GIFT CARD PURCHASER INTENDED TO TRANSFER THE RIGHT TO USE THE
GIFT CARD.
[(d)] (F) “Issuer” means a business organization or financial institution that
issues a credit card OR GIFT CARD or the authorized agent of the business organization or
financial institution.
(G) “ORIGINAL GIFT CARD PURCHASER” MEANS THE PERSON, BUSINESS
ORGANIZATION, OR FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT PURCHASED THE GIFT CARD.
8–204.1.
(A) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH THE INTENT TO DEFRAUD:
(I) TAKE A GIFT CARD FROM ANOTHER, OR FROM THE
POSSESSION, CUSTODY, OR CONTROL OF ANOTHER, WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE
ISSUER, ORIGINAL GIFT CARD PURCHASER, OR THE INTENDED GIFT CARD
RECIPIENT; OR
(II) WITH KNOWLEDGE THAT A GIFT CARD HAS BEEN TAKEN
UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, RECEIVE
THE GIFT CARD WITH THE INTENT TO USE OR SELL THE GIFT CARD OR TRANSFER
THE GIFT CARD TO ANOTHER WHO IS NOT THE ISSUER, ORIGINAL GIFT CARD
PURCHASER, OR THE INTENDED GIFT CARD RECIPIENT.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF GIFT
CARD THEFT.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT RECEIVE A GIFT CARD THAT THE PERSON
KNOWS WAS LOST, MISLAID, OR DELIVERED UNDER A MISTAKE AS TO THE IDENTITY
OR ADDRESS OF THE ORIGINAL GIFT CARD PURCHASER OR THE INTENDED GIFT

HOUSE BILL 1074
CARD RECIPIENT AND RETAIN POSSESSION OF THE GIFT CARD WITH THE INTENT TO
USE OR SELL THE GIFT CARD OR TRANSFER THE GIFT CARD TO ANOTHER WHO IS
NOT THE ISSUER, ORIGINAL GIFT CARD PURCHASER, OR THE INTENDED GIFT CARD
RECIPIENT.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF GIFT
CARD THEFT.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) SELL A GIFT CARD UNLESS THE PERSON IS THE ISSUER OR A
PERSON AUTHORIZED BY THE ISSUER TO SELL A GIFT CARD; OR
(2) BUY A GIFT CARD FROM A PERSON OTHER THAN THE ISSUER OR A
PERSON AUTHORIZED BY THE ISSUER TO SELL A GIFT CARD.
(D) A PERSON OTHER THAN THE ISSUER MAY NOT RECEIVE A GIFT CARD
THAT THE PERSON KNOWS WAS TAKEN OR RETAINED UNDER CIRCUMSTANCES THAT
CONSTITUTE:
(1) GIFT CARD THEFT; OR
(2) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A GIFT
CARD WITH A STORED OR ACCESSIBLE BALANCE OF FUNDS OF LESS THAN $100 IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A GIFT
CARD WITH A STORED OR ACCESSIBLE BALANCE OF FUNDS OF $100 OR MORE IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST CONVICTION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING
6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION,
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH.
8–205.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1074 5
(2) “FALSELY EMBOSS” MEANS TO CREATE A GIFT CARD WITHOUT
THE AUTHORIZATION OF THE ISSUER.
(3) “FALSELY MAKE” MEANS:
(I) TO MAKE OR DRAW, WHOLLY OR PARTLY, A DEVICE OR
INSTRUMENT THAT PURPORTS TO BE A GIFT CARD BUT THAT IS NOT A GIFT CARD
BECAUSE AN ISSUER DID NOT AUTHORIZE THE MAKING OR DRAWING; OR
(II) TO ALTER A GIFT CARD THAT WAS VALIDLY ISSUED.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH THE INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER:
(1) FALSELY MAKE A PURPORTED GIFT CARD;
(2) FALSELY EMBOSS A GIFT CARD; OR
(3) TRANSFER OR POSSESS:
(I) A FALSELY MADE INSTRUMENT OR DEVICE THAT PURPORTS
TO BE A GIFT CARD, WITH KNOWLEDGE THAT THE INSTRUMENT OR DEVICE WAS
FALSELY MADE; OR
(II) A FALSELY EMBOSSED GIFT CARD WITH KNOWLEDGE THAT
THE GIFT CARD WAS FALSELY EMBOSSED.
(C) A PERSON OTHER THAN THE INTENDED GIFT CARD RECIPIENT MAY NOT
SIGN A GIFT CARD WITH THE INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A
FALSELY MADE OR FALSELY EMBOSSED GIFT CARD WITH A PURPORTED OR ACTUAL
STORED OR ACCESSIBLE BALANCE OF FUNDS OF LESS THAN $100 IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A
FALSELY MADE OR FALSELY EMBOSSED GIFT CARD WITH A PURPORTED OR ACTUAL
STORED OR ACCESSIBLE BALANCE OF FUNDS OF $100 OR MORE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST CONVICTION, IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING
6 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH; AND

HOUSE BILL 1074
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT CONVICTION,
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.